Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3517
Election of trustees; special election; when held.

Notwithstanding the appointment of an administrator for any community improvement district pursuant to sections 18-3542 to 18-3551, special elections shall be held for the election of members of the board of trustees for such community improvement district in the same manner and at the same time as such elections would be held under sections 18-3514 and 18-3515. In a community improvement district for which such an administrator has been appointed when the board of trustees of such community improvement district is not functioning, the administrator shall cause a special election of trustees to be held within sixty days after the issuance of a certificate of appointment of such administrator, at which election a board of trustees shall be elected to a term of office which shall expire on the first Tuesday of the second September following the appointment of such administrator. The board of trustees shall have five members unless the board has amended its articles of association to decrease the number of trustees on the board to three members pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of section 18-3514.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 17.
April 17, 2026